Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 5
PEST CONTROL DISTRICTS

Section

35-5-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"APHIS" means the United States department of agriculture animal and plant health inspection, plant protection, and quarantine programs.

(1.5) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

"County" includes a city and county.

"District" means an area as provided for in section 35-5-104.

"District advisory committee" means the committee appointed as provided in section 35-5-105.

"Insect pest", as determined by the commissioner, means any of the small invertebrate animals generally having the body more or less obviously segmented, for the most part belonging to the class insecta, and which, upon investigation by the commissioner, are found to be in epidemic proportions.

"Inspector" means a county pest inspector.

"Landowner" means a person who owns five or more acres of land within the boundaries of the proposed district.

(7.1) "Lessee" means a person leasing five or more acres of state-owned land controlled by the state board of land commissioners within the boundaries of the proposed district.

"Noxious weeds", as determined by the commissioner, means those weeds which are especially troublesome and detrimental and which may cause damage or loss to a considerable portion of the land or livestock of a community.

"Person" includes person, firm, corporation, or association.

"Pest", as determined by the commissioner, means a noxious, destructive, or troublesome plant, insect, or plant disease, when found to be in epidemic proportions and of sufficient economic importance to threaten the public welfare.

"Plant diseases", as determined by the commissioner, means injurious action caused by the continuous or intermittent damage of all plants by any causal agent and expressed through symptoms.

"Resident landowner" means a person who owns five or more acres of land within the boundaries of the proposed district and has his legal residence within the county where the proposed district is located or within an adjacent county.

(12.1) "Resident lessee" means a person leasing five or more acres of state-owned land controlled by the state board of land commissioners within the boundaries of the proposed district and having his legal residence within the county where the proposed district is located or within an adjacent county.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 176, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-1.

L. 77:

(1) and (1.5) R&RE and (7.1) and (12.1) added, p. 1577, §§ 1, 2, effective June 4.

35-5-102. Duty to control weeds.

It is the duty of all persons owning land or any interest therein in the district, the department of transportation, the boards of county commissioners, school boards, the governing authorities of incorporated towns and cities and of railroads and ditch companies, and those persons supervising state-owned lands to use reasonable means to control the noxious weeds if the same are likely to be materially damaging to the land of neighboring landowners.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 177, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-2.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1311, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1074, § 56, effective July 1.

35-5-103. Methods of control - rules and regulations.

The commissioner is empowered to designate the methods to be used for the control or eradication of the various noxious weeds, insect pests, and plant diseases and to publish such methods and make and publish such reasonable rules and regulations as are proper and necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this article. The commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements with any landowner, lessee, district, city, or town, or with federal, state, or county agencies for cooperation and for cost sharing in the control and eradication of noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases located upon land that they control or administer within the district in keeping with the provisions of this article. The commissioner, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to advance funds, which may be appropriated for this purpose subject to reimbursement, to carry into effect the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 177, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-3.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1311, § 2, effective May 10.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24; for intergovernmental relationships, see part 2 of article 1 of title 29.

35-5-104. Pest control district - procedure to establish.

Whenever twenty-five percent of the resident landowners and resident lessees within a contiguous territory desire to form a pest control district, as defined in this subsection (1), they may file a petition for that purpose with the board of county commissioners of the county in which the land is located. Such petition shall be addressed to the board of county commissioners of such county, and shall contain a description of the boundaries of the proposed district and a description of the land of each person signing such petition, and shall state that the said proposed district has been invaded, or is in danger of being invaded, by noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases injurious to agricultural crops, trees, fruits, or pasture, and shall name the specific pests or diseases against which said petitioners desire to be protected, and shall state the termination date of the proposed district. Such petition shall be signed by each resident landowner and resident lessee joining in the petition by his proper signature, together with his address, and the date of the petition shall be the date of its filing in the office of the board of county commissioners. Any petitioner may revoke and cancel his signature to such petition at any time before said petition is filed, but not after such filing has been made.

Such petition shall be filed with the board of county commissioners during a regular or special session of the board, and shall be verified under oath by at least one of the persons signing it, setting forth that the said petition was signed within ninety days last preceding the making of said verification, and that all matters and things stated in said petition are true to the best of the knowledge and belief of the affiant, and that all signers have had an opportunity to read said petition.

After examination of the petition, if the board of county commissioners finds the petition in order and properly signed by twenty-five percent of the resident landowners and resident lessees within the proposed district, the board shall, within fifteen days after receipt of the petition, mail ballots to all landowners and lessees in the proposed district, to the addresses as shown by the records of the county assessor or state board of land commissioners, stating that said ballots are to be returned to the board's office within ten days from date of mailing. If, after a tally of the votes has been made, the board finds that sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the landowners and lessees voting have voted in favor of the district, and the landowners and lessees voting own or lease fifty percent of the land in the proposed district, the board shall declare the district established. Acreage owned by the federal government or acreage owned by the state government not subject to a lease shall not be considered in determining the percentage of land voted.

Such petition may, in addition to the matters set forth in this section, request the board of county commissioners to take charge of and supervise the work in connection with the control or eradication of the pests named. The board, if a pest control district is created upon the petition in accordance with this article, shall proceed during the existence of said district, through the county pest inspector, to control or destroy such pests at the times and in the manner and by the aid of such means and additional help as the commissioner and county pest inspector recommend, and the board may enter into contracts to have the necessary work done in the district where noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases occur in epidemic proportion. Such contracts shall be let through competitive bidding, and the board may pay for the work and materials expended. Said contracts may be let for periods not to exceed one year and may be renewed if necessary. The board of county commissioners also may enter into contracts with landowners and lessees in which the landowners and lessees are obligated for their share of the total cost of control operations.

If the owner or lessee of any lands adjoining an established pest control district desires to have such lands included within the district, he may petition the board of county commissioners of the county in which the district is located and to which district annexation of his land is desired. The petition shall contain a description of the boundaries of the lands so desired to be annexed and shall be signed by the petitioner. The board shall act on said petition within ten days after the receipt thereof. If the board finds that the petition is in order, that the boundaries of the lands described in the petition are accurate, that the lands adjoin the established district, and that the petition is properly signed, it shall, by order, declare that the lands petitioned to be annexed to the district shall be included as a part of the district. Within ten days after such action upon the petition, the board shall notify the petitioner, the county assessor, the district advisory committee of the district in which such lands are to be included, and the department of agriculture of its action. Two or more owners and lessees of lands adjoining an established pest control district may join in and sign a single petition for annexation of their adjoining lands to an established district in the manner prescribed in this subsection (5).

The district advisory committees of two or more adjoining pest control districts may petition the board of county commissioners of the county in which such districts are located, requesting the consolidation of such districts. The board shall schedule a public hearing on the petition within ten days after the receipt thereof. The public hearing shall be held within thirty days after receipt of the petition. If, after such hearing, the board determines that through such consolidation the districts could be more economically and efficiently operated, the board shall immediately, by order, declare the dissolution of the districts to be consolidated and the establishment of the consolidated new district, and shall thereupon notify the county assessor and district advisory committees of the dissolved districts of the termination of their respective committees, and shall appoint a new five-member district advisory committee for the consolidated district.

When a pest control district which was established for the control and eradication of specified pests desires to extend the termination date of the district, the district advisory committee shall petition the board of county commissioners of the county in which such district is located, requesting the extension of the termination date. Upon receipt of said petition, the board of county commissioners shall set a date for a hearing on the matter and shall publish notice thereof in a newspaper of general circulation in the county not less than ten days nor more than thirty days before the date of the hearing. If, after notice and hearing, the board of county commissioners determines that such extension of the termination date is advisable and is needed for adequate pest control in the district, the board of county commissioners shall immediately declare the extension of the termination date and shall so inform the district advisory committee, the county assessor, and the state board of land commissioners.

When a pest control district which was established for the control and eradication of specified pests desires to add additional pests to be controlled within the district, the district advisory committee shall petition the board of county commissioners of the county in which such district is located, requesting that a stipulated pest or pests should be added to the pests to be controlled in the district. The board of county commissioners shall act on the petition within ten days after receipt thereof. If the board of county commissioners determines that such pests should be controlled within the district, said board shall submit the question to all landowners and lessees of the district by causing to be mailed to each landowner and lessee, to the address as shown by the records of the county assessor or state board of land commissioners, a ballot requesting his vote for or against the addition of the stipulated pests to be controlled within the district and the return of such ballot within ten days to the board. If fifty-one percent of the landowners and lessees voting in the district vote in favor of the inclusion of said pests within those to be controlled, the board shall immediately declare that the stipulated pests shall be controlled within the district and shall so inform the district advisory committee.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 178, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-4.

L. 61:

p. 155, §§ 1, 2.

L. 63:

p. 160, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-4.

L. 75:

(7) amended, p. 1340, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 83:

(1) and (3) to (8) amended, p. 1312, § 3, effective May 10.

L. 2000:

(6) amended, p. 5, § 1, effective August 2.

35-5-105. Advisory committee.

After the formation of a pest control district and before any weed or pest control program has been initiated by the county pest inspector, the board of county commissioners shall appoint an advisory committee of five or more members, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board of county commissioners. Should a vacancy occur, the board of county commissioners shall fill the vacancy by appointment within thirty days. The committee members may be resident landowners or resident lessees and, insofar as is practical, shall have a practical knowledge of weed and pest control and shall geographically represent the district.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 179, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-5.

L. 65:

p. 178, § 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1314, § 4, effective May 10.

35-5-106. Pest inspector, deputies, and employees.

The board of county commissioners of the county concerned may appoint a qualified person, subject to the approval of the commissioner and district advisory committee, as county pest inspector. It is the duty of said inspector to carry out his duties as provided in this article under the direction of the board and the commissioner. The inspector, with the approval of the board, may employ such deputies and employees as are necessary to perform his duties under this article. The salary of the inspector and of his deputies and employees shall be determined by the board.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 179, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-6.

Cross references:

For appointment of county pest inspectors, see § 35-4-104.

35-5-107. Duties of pest inspector.

The inspector shall cooperate with the commissioner in locating infestations of noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases; make an annual report of known infestations of noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases and compile data on areas controlled, eradicated, or under treatment; submit reports thereon to the commissioner, the district advisory committee, and the board of county commissioners by December 1 of each year; consult with the commissioner and the extension service and advise upon all matters pertaining to the best and most practical methods of noxious weed, insect pest, or plant disease control and eradication; and render every possible assistance to obtain the most effective control or eradication of noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases within the district.

The commissioner or the inspector, or their deputies, having jurisdiction, together with such assistants as they may need in the prosecution of their work, are authorized during reasonable business hours to enter upon or into any premises, lands, or places within any pest control district in this state where they may suspect that pests occur which may be determined by the commissioner to be injurious to the welfare of the community for the purpose of inspecting, controlling, or eradicating the same or otherwise carrying out the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 179, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-7.

35-5-108. Control or eradication methods and procedures - notice - assessments - protests.

The county pest inspector shall give notice by radio, newspaper, or any other means of communication to the owner, lessee, agent, or occupant of any lands within a district on which noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases are found, advising them of their presence and naming the noxious weed, insect pest, or plant disease, giving both common and scientific names. Such notice shall specify the best available methods of controlling or eradicating such noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases and shall require that such methods be used for control or eradication thereof. Failure to receive such notice shall not constitute a defense to the assessment of a lien against the property, as provided in this section, for the expense for the control or eradication of such pests.

In case any such landowner, lessee, agent, or occupant refuses to comply with the requirements of the county pest inspector for the control or eradication of such noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases, or causes the same to be done, it is the duty of the inspector to provide access to sprayers or other equipment needed and to enter upon such lands with the approval of the board of county commissioners and, as provided in this article, to effect the control or eradication of such noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases.

Upon completion of the work, the board of county commissioners shall notify or cause to be notified said landowner, by certified mail, at the address shown on the records of the county assessor, or by one publication in a newspaper having general circulation within the county, as to the amount due, furnishing an itemized statement of the expense of the treatment of such noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases (the amount paid the inspector shall not be included), and stating that, if the amount of said statement is not paid to the county treasurer of the county wherein the real estate is located within thirty days from the date of said notice, the amount thereof will be assessed as a lien upon said real estate, but no lien shall be in excess of the valuation for assessment of said real estate.

If any landowner within the district is dissatisfied with the itemized statement of expense, he may, within thirty days from the mailing or publication of the account showing such charge, file a written protest with the board of county commissioners. Not later than ten days after the filing of such protest, the board of county commissioners shall fix a time and place for hearing on the protest filed, to be held not less than ten days nor more than thirty days from the date of notice of the hearing, and immediately after such hearing the board of county commissioners shall make written findings and such changes in the assessment as may be determined to conform with such findings.

A copy of said final statement of expenses shall be filed with the county assessor. If the amount of the statement is not paid within thirty days of said notice or if a protest is filed, within thirty days after the findings or determination of such protest, the county assessor shall extend the amount upon the assessment rolls, and said assessment shall thereon become a part of the general taxes and constitute a lien against the entire contiguous tract owned by such person of which the portion so treated is all or a part. The assessment shall thereafter become due in the same manner and be collected in the same manner as the general ad valorem property tax; but not more than five percent of the total valuation for assessment of the entire contiguous tract of land of which the portion so treated is all or a part shall be spread on the tax rolls against said land in any one year. Any amount in excess of the five percent limitation and remaining unpaid may be carried over and charged on the tax roll of the succeeding years, and any unpaid balance so carried over shall bear interest at the rate of six percent per annum until paid. All of the provisions of the general laws for the enforcement of the collection of taxes shall be applicable thereto after the extension by the county assessor. Such assessments may be paid in full at any time before general taxes become due and payable.

Upon completion of the work, the board of county commissioners shall notify or cause to be notified said lessee, by certified mail, at the address shown on the records of the state board of land commissioners, or by one publication in a newspaper having general circulation within the county, of the amount due, furnishing an itemized statement of the expense of the treatment of such noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases (the amount paid the inspector shall not be included), and stating that, if the amount of said statement is not paid to the county treasurer of the county wherein the leased property is located within thirty days from the date of said notice, the amount thereof will be assessed as a lien upon any improvements located upon the leased property and owned by the lessee. The county shall institute civil proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the amount of the assessment. In the event the value of said improvements is less than the amount of the assessment, the county may recover the difference by execution on such personal property of the lessee that is not exempt, as provided by law.

If any lessee within the district is dissatisfied with the itemized statement of expense, he may file a written protest with the board of county commissioners as provided by subsection (4) of this section.

A copy of the final statement of expense shall be filed with the county assessor. If the amount of the statement is not paid within thirty days of said notice or if a protest is filed, within thirty days after the findings or determination of such protest, the county assessor shall extend the amount upon the assessment rolls, and said assessment shall thereon become a part of the general taxes and constitute a lien against any improvements located upon the tract and owned by the lessee. If a judgment in favor of the county is not satisfied as the result of execution on the property, the county shall seek to satisfy the judgment by levying upon any personal property held by the lessee which is not exempt, as provided by law.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 180, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-8.

L. 83:

(1) and (2) amended and (6) added, p. 1314, § 5, effective May 10.

Cross references:

For collection of ad valorem taxes, see article 10 of title 39.

35-5-109. Owner or lessee refuses action.

When noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases are found on a property not listed on the tax rolls of the county and the owner or lessee of the property refuses or fails to take the necessary action to control or eradicate such noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases, after notice as prescribed in section 35-5-108, the county pest inspector shall treat the same as though listed on the tax rolls, and the expense thereof may be recovered by the county in an action therefor in any court of competent jurisdiction. The control or eradication of noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases on county property may be contracted for by the inspector, with the approval of the board of county commissioners, at county expense.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 182, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-9.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1315, § 6, effective May 10.

35-5-110. Public nuisance - abatement.

Any noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases with respect to which a control district has been proclaimed, and any and all stages thereof, their carriers, and any and all premises, plants, and things infested or exposed to infestation therewith within such area are declared to be a public nuisance, subject to all laws and remedies relating to the prevention and abatement of nuisances. The inspector, under the supervision and direction of the commissioner and with the approval of the board of county commissioners, in a summary manner or otherwise, may take such action, including removal and destruction, with reference to such nuisance as in his discretion seems necessary. The remedies of this section shall be cumulative with all other remedies provided in this article.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 182, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-10.

35-5-111. Reports of acreage infested - county tax levy - fund - allocation.

The commissioner is directed, and it is his duty, to ascertain each year, from reports of the inspectors and other sources, the approximate amount of land and highways infested with the most troublesome noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases, and their location, and transmit such information tabulated by counties, not later than July 1 of each year, to the board of county commissioners of each county affected by such infestation. On the basis of such information, the board of county commissioners of each county may make a tax levy each year on real property for the purpose of paying the cost of noxious weed, insect pest, or plant disease control or eradication in a district of the county as provided by this section, but such levy shall not exceed two mills in any one year.

Moneys collected from such levy shall be set apart as a pest control fund, and moneys derived from a particular district shall be used only in that district, and moneys derived on a countywide basis shall be used for the whole county. Vouchers shall be drawn against said fund by the board for items of expense incident to the control or eradication of noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases in the county or in any such district. Such expenditures and accounts shall be audited annually.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 182, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-11.

L. 61:

p. 158, § 1.

L. 63:

p. 160, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-11.

L. 65:

p. 178, § 2.

Cross references:

For limitations on increasing levies of political subdivisions, see part 3 of article 1 of title 29.

35-5-112. Pest control district on public lands - notice - charges.

When an area designated as a pest control district by the board of county commissioners of any county contains public lands, it is the duty of the commissioner to notify the proper state departments which control or supervise the public lands within the area so designated that such a district has been formed. It is the duty of any such department so notified to control or eradicate all noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases on any lands under its jurisdiction, and included within the boundaries of the district and for which the district was organized, using the methods prescribed by the commissioner.

In case such department fails to so control or eradicate such pests, it is the duty of the inspector in the county where the infestation is located to enter upon such lands and undertake the control or eradication of such noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases, or cause the same to be done, the expense thereof to be a proper charge against the department which has jurisdiction over the lands. If not paid, such charge may be recovered in an action therefor by the county in any court of competent jurisdiction; except that it is permissible for any such state department which controls or supervises lands in the designated pest control district to enter into a contract with the board of county commissioners of the county wherein the land is situated to authorize the county pest inspector to undertake the control or eradication of all noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases, as provided in this article, on state-controlled land in the district on terms and conditions satisfactory to both parties.

In the case of lands controlled by the state board of land commissioners, which land is included within a district and leased to a lessee, the costs incurred in controlling or eradicating noxious weeds, insect pests, or plant diseases, which would be chargeable to the owner of the land if privately owned, shall be paid by the lessee.

All park land in the state, except that owned by the United States, shall be excluded from charges provided for in this article, and the board of county commissioners of the county in which any such park is located shall be billed for any and all assessments on such park lands.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 183, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-12.

L. 83:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1316, § 7, effective May 10.

35-5-113. Deputy or agent may exercise power.

Whenever any power or authority is given by any provisions of this article to any person, it may be exercised by any deputy or agent duly authorized by him.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 183, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-13.

35-5-114. Liberal construction.

This article, being necessary to secure and preserve the public health, safety, convenience, and welfare, and for the security of public and private property, shall be liberally construed to effect the purpose of this article.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 184, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-14.

35-5-115. Dissolution of district.

The district may be dissolved by the same procedure as the district was created on petition of twenty-five percent of the resident landowners of the district upon a vote of sixty-six and two-thirds percent of those owning the land in the district under similar procedure to that of organizing the district, if a program is not in effect. On and after July 1, 1990, a district may also be dissolved when such question is presented to the resident landowners by the board of county commissioners and more than fifty percent of said landowners voting on the issue vote to dissolve the district; except that no vote is required when two or more districts are being consolidated pursuant to section 35-5-104 (6).

Source:

L. 59:

p. 184, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 6-16-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-5-15.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1557, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 5, § 2, effective August 2.

35-5-116. Major grasshopper and range caterpillar infestations.

Authority is hereby granted the governor of the state of Colorado to declare a major grasshopper or range caterpillar infestation and to declare an emergency resulting from said major infestation. Upon said declaration, funds from the governor's agricultural emergency and disaster fund shall be made available for grasshopper or range caterpillar control.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1342, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1577, § 3, effective June 4.

35-5-117. Emergency measures.

When the governor determines and declares an emergency resulting from a major grasshopper or range caterpillar infestation, he shall specify the area or areas of the major infestation. Within such area or areas, he is authorized to direct that such emergency measures be taken as he deems necessary to alleviate conditions which gravely jeopardize property and resources.

In directing that emergency measures be taken, the governor is hereby authorized to:

Utilize equipment, supplies, facilities, personnel, and other like available resources belonging to the state of Colorado in possession of any state agency;

Enter into contracts for the acquisition, rental, or hire of equipment, services, materials, and supplies;

Accept assistance, services, and facilities tendered by federal and local governmental units or private agencies;

Accept on behalf of the state the provisions and benefits of acts of congress designated to provide for assisting states.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1342, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1578, § 4, effective June 4.

35-5-118. Right of entry.

All persons authorized to carry out emergency measures directed under the provisions of this article shall have free access to all public and private lands, premises, and buildings within the areas specified and are authorized to enter thereon and to perform such work and take such measures as directed without the consent of the owners thereof if the entry is reasonably necessary to actually alleviate or prevent the disaster.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1343, § 1, effective May 30.

35-5-119. Procedure for establishing grasshopper and range caterpillar control districts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1343, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 77:

(1), (3), and (5) amended, p. 1578, § 5, effective June 4.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1317, § 10, effective May 10.

35-5-120. Grasshopper and range caterpillar control.

The board of county commissioners of each county in which the governor has declared an emergency resulting from a major grasshopper or range caterpillar infestation is hereby authorized and directed to establish a system of priorities for any operation involving the control of grasshoppers or range caterpillars in infested areas. Such board of county commissioners shall certify to the commissioner any area within a county which has established a grasshopper or range caterpillar control district in areas infested with grasshoppers or range caterpillars and in which sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the landowners and lessees have agreed to pay a proportionate share of the cost per acre for grasshopper or range caterpillar control, as determined by the commissioner, as a contribution to pay the cost of controlling the grasshoppers or range caterpillars which are infesting said area.

Upon receipt by the commissioner of a certification of such an area, and upon deposit with the commissioner of the landowner's and lessee's projected share of the cost of control for grasshoppers or range caterpillars, the commissioner shall immediately direct operations to commence to control the grasshoppers or range caterpillars in such area.

In attempting to control grasshoppers or range caterpillars in established control districts, the commissioner shall not be required to conduct control operations on other than range acreage.

If the commissioner, with approval of the district advisory committee as established in section 35-5-105, determines at any time that control operations would not significantly reduce the grasshopper or range caterpillar populations in the established control districts, he may order that said operations be suspended or terminated.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1344, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1579, § 6, effective June 4.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 1316, § 8, effective May 10.

35-5-121. Immunity.

Neither the state or its agencies, officers, or employees nor the officers, agents, employees, or representatives of any governmental or private concern shall be liable for any claim based upon the exercise or performance or the failure to exercise or perform a function prescribed under the provisions of sections 35-5-116 to 35-5-121.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1344, § 1, effective May 30.

35-5-122. Costs of control operations.

The costs of grasshopper or range caterpillar control operations shall be borne as follows:

Landowners and lessees in grasshopper or range caterpillar control districts shall assume one-third of the cost in those instances where the commissioner enters into an arrangement with APHIS whereby APHIS agrees to pay one-third of such costs.

Landowners and lessees in grasshopper or range caterpillar control districts shall assume two-thirds of the costs in those instances where the commissioner is unable to enter into a cost-sharing arrangement with APHIS.

One-third of the costs shall be paid from the governor's agricultural emergency and disaster fund.

The money deposited by the landowners and lessees to control grasshoppers or range caterpillars shall be available to the commissioner to administer the control of such infestations.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1579, § 7, effective June 4.

L. 83:

(1)(d) added, p. 1316, § 9, effective May 10.

35-5-123. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized, after opportunity for hearing and in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to promulgate appropriate rules and regulations concerning:

Payment of costs by landowners and lessees, APHIS, and the governor's agricultural emergency and disaster fund;

Procedures for awarding contracts for grasshopper and range caterpillar control operations, which procedures shall follow as nearly as practicable the procedures for awarding contracts of the department of personnel, the terms and conditions of such contracts, bonding requirements, and qualifications of those contracting to do the control work;

Methods and materials of control to be used in grasshopper and range caterpillar control operations;

Protection of the environment, businesses, and industries located in grasshopper and range caterpillar control districts.

The commissioner is further empowered to make and publish such reasonable rules and regulations as are proper and necessary to put into effect the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1580, § 7, effective June 4.

L. 95:

(1)(b) amended, p. 666, § 104, effective July 1.

35-5-124. No weed districts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1557, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section repealed, p. 847, § 2, effective April 7.

35-5-125. Cooperation between districts.

When pests may be more economically, completely, or satisfactorily managed, two or more boards of county commissioners may contract with one another to manage and control pests, including, but not limited to, sharing costs and employees. A board of county commissioners shall not contract to share resources, including costs or employees, with another such board unless both boards and both district advisory committees of such boards authorize such sharing.

A contract created pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be in writing and contain the purposes, rights, powers, responsibilities, and financial obligations of each contracting county.

If other law has requirements applicable to special types of intergovernmental contracts or cooperative agreements, such law shall control.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 847, § 1, effective April 7.